test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-ceve_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - čeve: # eres
    čeve+N+Sg+Nom: čeṿ̣e
    čeve+N+Sg+Gen: čiäpˊpát
    čeve+N+Sg+Acc: čiäpˊpát
    čeve+N+Sg+Ill: čiäˊpáttân
    čeve+N+Sg+Loc: čiäˊpáttist
    čeve+N+Sg+Com: čiäˊpáttáin
    čeve+N+Sg+Abe: čiäpˊpáttáá
    čeve+N+Ess: [čiäˊpáttin, čevveen]
    čeve+N+Par: [čiäˊpáttid, čevveed]
    čeve+N+Pl+Nom: čiäˊpátteh
    čeve+N+Pl+Gen: čiäˊpáttij
    čeve+N+Pl+Acc: čiäˊpáttijd
    čeve+N+Pl+Ill: čiäˊpáttáid
    čeve+N+Pl+Loc: čiäˊpáttijn
    čeve+N+Pl+Com: čiäˊpáttijguin
    čeve+N+Pl+Abe: čiäˊpáttijttáá

    
    
